New York, session 2025-2026, A664.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 353-a of the agriculture and markets law is amended 2 by adding a new subdivision 4 to read as follows: 3 4. On and after the effective date of this subdivision, no person who 4 is convicted of a violation of this section shall own or possess a 5 companion animal unless and until authorized by a court order issued by 6 a county court judge of such convicted person's county of residence. No 7 such order shall be issued until such convicted person first demon- 8 strates to the court that such convicted person has undergone psychiat- 9 ric or psychological testing, the results of which indicate by clear and 10 convincing evidence of such convicted person's capable and sound mental 11 capacity and ability to own and properly care for such an animal in a 12 humane manner. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 14 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02633-02-5